District of Columbia statutes.
22-2105

Penalty for manslaughter.

Whoever is guilty of manslaughter shall be sentenced to a period of imprisonment not exceeding 30 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1321, ch. 854, § 802
May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-256, § 2(c), 42 DCR 20
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 303(b), 60 DCR 2064
Committing crime when armed, additional penalty, see §§ 22-4501 and 22-4502.
Negligent homicide, see §§ 50-2203.01 and 50-2203.02.
Operation of a motor vehicle, driving under influence prima facie evidence, see § 50-2205.02.
This section is referenced in § 22-3152, § 24-112, and § 50-2206.51.
1981 Ed., § 22-2405.
1973 Ed., § 22-2405.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(b) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.